tests/data/oci-pgen.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>
  <alphabet/>


  <pardefs>
	  
  <pardef n="numeros">
	  <e>
		  <i>1</i>
	  </e>
	  <e>
		  <i>2</i>
	  </e>
	  <e>
		  <i>3</i>
	  </e>
	  <e>
		  <i>4</i>
	  </e>
	  <e>
		  <i>5</i>
	  </e>
	  <e>
		  <i>6</i>
	  </e>
	  <e>
		  <i>7</i>
	  </e>
	  <e>
		  <i>8</i>
	  </e>
	  <e>
		  <i>9</i>
	  </e>
	  <e>
		  <i>0</i>
	  </e>
    </pardef>
	 
    <pardef n="caracter_general">
      <e>
	<i>;</i>
      </e>

      <e>
	<i>)</i>
      </e>
      <e>
	<i>:</i>
      </e>
      <e>
	<i>(</i>
      </e>
      <e>
	<i>[</i>
      </e>
      <e>
	<i>]</i>
      </e>
     <e>
	<i>"</i>
      </e>
      <e>
	<i>'</i>
      </e>
      <e>
	<i>*</i>
      </e>
      <e>
	<i>@</i>
      </e>
      <e>
	<i>«</i>
      </e>
      <e>
	<i>-</i>
      </e>
      <e>
	<i>,</i>
      </e>
      <e>
	<i>?</i>
      </e>
      <e>
	<i>/</i>
      </e>
      <e>
	<i>`</i>
      </e>
      <e>
	<i>±</i>
      </e>
      <e>
	<i>­</i>
      </e>
      <e>
	<i> </i>
      </e>
      <e>
	<i>$</i>
      </e>
      <e>
	<i>)</i>
      </e>
      <e>
	<i>:</i>
      </e>
      <e>
	<i>.</i>
      </e>
      <e>
	<par n="numeros"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
	 
	 <pardef n="vocals">
		 <e>
			 <i>a</i>
		 </e>
		  <e>
			 <i>e</i>
		 </e>
		 <e>
			 <i>i</i>
		 </e>
		 <e>
			 <i>o</i>
		 </e>
		 <e>
			 <i>u</i>
		 </e>
		 <e>
			 <i>à</i>
		 </e>
		 <e>
			 <i>á</i>
		 </e>
		 <e>
			 <i>é</i>
		 </e>
		 <e>
			 <i>è</i>
		 </e>
		 <e>
			 <i>í</i>
		 </e>
		 <e>
			 <i>ó</i>
		 </e>
		 <e>
			 <i>ò</i>
		 </e>
		 <e>
			 <i>ú</i>
		 </e>
		 <e>
			 <i>ü</i>
		 </e>
	 </pardef>


	 <pardef n="vocal_general">
		 <e>
			 <par n="vocals"/>
		 </e>
	
		 <e>
			 <i>"</i>
			 <par n="vocals"/>
		 </e>
		 <e>
			 <i>«</i>
			 <par n="vocals"/>
		 </e>
		 <e>
			 <i>*</i>
			 <par n="vocals"/>
		 </e>
		 <e>
			 <i>"*</i>
			 <par n="vocals"/>
		 </e>
		 <e>
			 <i>«*</i>
			 <par n="vocals"/>
		 </e>
		 <e>
			 <i>« *</i>
			 <par n="vocals"/>
		 </e>
		 <e>
			 <i>#</i>
			 <par n="vocals"/>
		 </e>
		 <e>
			 <i>"#</i>
			 <par n="vocals"/>
		 </e>
		 <e>
			 <i>«#</i>
			 <par n="vocals"/>
		 </e>
		 <e>
			 <i>« #</i>
			 <par n="vocals"/>
		 </e>
	
    </pardef>

	 <pardef n="consonant">
		 <e>
			 <i>b</i>
		 </e>
		 <e>
			 <i>c</i>
		 </e>
		 <e>
			 <i>ç</i>
		 </e>
		 <e>
			 <i>d</i>
		 </e>
		 <e>
			 <i>f</i>
		 </e>
		 <e>
			 <i>g</i>
		 </e>
		 <e>
			 <i>h</i>
		 </e> 
		 <e>
			 <i>j</i>
		 </e>
		 <e>
			 <i>k</i>
		 </e>
		 <e>
			 <i>l</i>
		 </e>
		 <e>
			 <i>m</i>
		 </e>
		 <e>
			 <i>n</i>
		 </e>
		 <e>
			 <i>p</i>
		 </e>
		 <e>
			 <i>q</i>
		 </e>
		 <e>
			 <i>r</i>
		 </e>
		 <e>
			 <i>s</i>
		 </e>
		<e>
			 <i>t</i>
		 </e>
		 <e>
			 <i>v</i>
		 </e>
		 <e>
			 <i>w</i>
		 </e>
		 <e>
			 <i>x</i>
		 </e>
		 <e>
			 <i>y</i>
		 </e>
		 <e>
			 <i>z</i>
		 </e>
    </pardef>

<pardef n="quotes">
	<e><i>"</i></e>
	<e><i>'</i></e>
	<e><i>«</i></e>
	<e><i>" </i></e>
	<e><i>' </i></e>
	<e><i>« </i></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="quotes_empty">
	<e><i/></e>
	<e>
		<par n="quotes"/>
	</e>
</pardef>


	 <pardef n="en_apostrofat">
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l/>
				 <r>'n<b/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l/>
				 <r><b/>n'</r>
			 </p>
			<par n="vocal_general"/>
		 </e>
	 </pardef>
	 

	<pardef n="ad_aran">
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/><a/>prneth<b/></l>
			<r>da<b/>eth<b/></r>
		</p>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/><a/>prnera<b/></l> 
			<r>da<b/>era<b/></r>
		</p>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/><a/>prneri<b/></l>
			<r>da<b/>eri<b/></r>
		</p>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/><a/>prneres<b/></l> 
			<r>da<b/>eres<b/></r>
		</p>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/><a/>a</l>
			<r>d<b/>a</r>
		</p>
	</e>

	 </pardef>

<pardef n="ad_gascon">
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/><a/>prneth<b/></l>
			<r>d<b/>eth<b/></r>
		</p>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/><a/>prnera<b/></l> 
			<r>d<b/>era<b/></r>
		</p>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/><a/>prneths<b/></l>
			<r>d<b/>eths<b/></r>
		</p>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/><a/>prneras<b/></l> 
			<r>d<b/>eras<b/></r>
		</p>
	</e>

	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/><a/>aqueth<b/></l>
			<r>d<b/>aqueth<b/></r>
		</p>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/><a/>aquera<b/></l> 
			<r>d<b/>aquera<b/></r>
		</p>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/><a/>aqueths<b/></l>
			<r>d<b/>aqueths<b/></r>
		</p>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/><a/>aqueras<b/></l> 
			<r>d<b/>aqueras<b/></r>
		</p>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/><a/>aqueth</l>
			<r>d<b/>aqueth</r>
		</p>
		<par n="caracter_general"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/><a/>aquera</l> 
			<r>d<b/>aquera</r>
		</p>
		<par n="caracter_general"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/><a/>aqueths</l>
			<r>d<b/>aqueths</r>
		</p>
		<par n="caracter_general"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/><a/>aqueras</l> 
			<r>d<b/>aqueras</r>
		</p>
		<par n="caracter_general"/>
	</e>

	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/>aceth<b/></l>
			<r>d<b/>aceth<b/></r>
		</p>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/>acera<b/></l> 
			<r>d<b/>acera<b/></r>
		</p>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/>aceths<b/></l>
			<r>d<b/>aceths<b/></r>
		</p>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/>aceras<b/></l> 
			<r>d<b/>aceras<b/></r>
		</p>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/>aceth</l>
			<r>d<b/>aceth</r>
		</p>
		<par n="caracter_general"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/>acera</l> 
			<r>d<b/>acera</r>
		</p>
		<par n="caracter_general"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/>aceths</l>
			<r>d<b/>aceths</r>
		</p>
		<par n="caracter_general"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/>aceras</l> 
			<r>d<b/>aceras</r>
		</p>
		<par n="caracter_general"/>
	</e>

	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/>aqueste<b/></l>
			<r>d<b/>aqueste<b/></r>
		</p>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/>aquesta<b/></l> 
			<r>d<b/>aquesta<b/></r>
		</p>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/>aquestes<b/></l>
			<r>d<b/>aquestes<b/></r>
		</p>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/>aquestas<b/></l> 
			<r>d<b/>aquestas<b/></r>
		</p>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/>aqueste</l>
			<r>d<b/>aqueste</r>
		</p>
		<par n="caracter_general"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/>aquesta</l> 
			<r>d<b/>aquesta</r>
		</p>
		<par n="caracter_general"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/>aquestes</l>
			<r>d<b/>aquestes</r>
		</p>
		<par n="caracter_general"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/>aquestas</l> 
			<r>d<b/>aquestas</r>
		</p>
		<par n="caracter_general"/>
	</e>

	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/>aute<b/></l>
			<r>d<b/>aute<b/></r>
		</p>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/>auta<b/></l> 
			<r>d<b/>auta<b/></r>
		</p>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/>autes<b/></l>
			<r>d<b/>autes<b/></r>
		</p>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/>autas<b/></l> 
			<r>d<b/>autas<b/></r>
		</p>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/>aute</l>
			<r>d<b/>aute</r>
		</p>
		<par n="caracter_general"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/>auta</l> 
			<r>d<b/>auta</r>
		</p>
		<par n="caracter_general"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/>autes</l>
			<r>d<b/>autes</r>
		</p>
		<par n="caracter_general"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/>autas</l> 
			<r>d<b/>autas</r>
		</p>
		<par n="caracter_general"/>
	</e>

	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/><a/>ac<b/></l> 
			<r>d<b/>ac<b/></r>
		</p>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/><a/>ac</l> 
			<r>d<b/>ac</r>
		</p>
		<par n="caracter_general"/>
	</e>

	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/>arrés<b/></l> 
			<r>d<b/>arrés<b/></r>
		</p>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/>arrés</l> 
			<r>d<b/>arrés</r>
		</p>
		<par n="caracter_general"/>
	</e>

	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/>arren<b/></l> 
			<r>d<b/>arren<b/></r>
		</p>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/>arren</l> 
			<r>d<b/>arren</r>
		</p>
		<par n="caracter_general"/>
	</e>

	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/>arrís<b/></l> 
			<r>d<b/>arrís<b/></r>
		</p>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/>arrís</l> 
			<r>d<b/>arrís</r>
		</p>
		<par n="caracter_general"/>
	</e>

	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/>arrens<b/></l> 
			<r>d<b/>arrens<b/></r>
		</p>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/>arrens</l> 
			<r>d<b/>arrens</r>
		</p>
		<par n="caracter_general"/>
	</e>
</pardef>

	<e>
		<p>
			<l><a/>que<b/><a/>a<b/><a/>detlo<b/></l>
			<r>qu'a<b/>l'</r>
		</p>
		<par n="vocal_general"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><a/>que<b/><a/>la<b/></l>
			<r>que<b/>l'</r>
		</p>
		<par n="vocal_general"/>
	</e>
 	<e>
		<p>
			<l><a/>la<b/><a/>ne<b/></l>
			<r>la</r>
		</p>
		<par n="en_apostrofat"/>
 	</e>
 	<e>
		<p>
			<l><a/>lo<b/><a/>ne<b/></l>
			<r>lo</r>
		</p>
		<par n="en_apostrofat"/>
 	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><a/>jos<b/><a/>detla<b/></l>
			<r>jos<b/>l'<b/></r>
		</p>
		<par n="vocal_general"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><a/>sus<b/><a/>detla<b/></l>
			<r>sus<b/>l'<b/></r>
		</p>
		<par n="vocal_general"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<par n="quotes_empty"/>
		<p>
			<l><a/>detla<b/></l>
			<r>l'</r>
		</p>
		<par n="vocal_general"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<par n="quotes_empty"/>
		<p>
			<l><a/>detlo<b/></l>
			<r>l'</r>
		</p>
		<par n="vocal_general"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><a/>ma<b/></l>
			<r>mon<b/></r>
		</p>
		<par n="vocal_general"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><a/>sa<b/></l>
			<r>son<b/></r>
		</p>
		<par n="vocal_general"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><a/>de<b/><a/>ta<b/></l>
			<r>de<b/>ton<b/></r>
		</p>
		<par n="vocal_general"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><a/>sus<b/><a/>ma<b/></l>
			<r>sus<b/>mon<b/></r>
		</p>
		<par n="vocal_general"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><a/>sus<b/><a/>sa<b/></l>
			<r>sus<b/>son<b/></r>
		</p>
		<par n="vocal_general"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><a/>jos<b/><a/>ta<b/></l>
			<r>jos<b/>ton<b/></r>
		</p>
		<par n="vocal_general"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><a/>me<b/></l>
			<r>m'</r>
		</p>
		<par n="vocal_general"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><a/>se<b/></l>
			<r>s'</r>
		</p>
		<par n="vocal_general"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><a/>me<b/><a/>ne<b/></l>
			<r>me</r>
		</p>
		<par n="en_apostrofat"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><a/>que<b/><a/>se<b/><a/>ne<b/></l>
			<r>que<b/>se</r>
		</p>
		<par n="en_apostrofat"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><a/>te<b/><a/>ne<b/></l>
			<r>te</r>
		</p>
		<par n="en_apostrofat"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><a/>nos<b/><a/>ne<b/></l>
			<r>nos<b/>n'</r>
		</p>
		<par n="vocal_general"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><a/>te<b/><a/>lo<b/></l>
			<r>te<b/>l'</r>
		</p>
		<par n="vocal_general"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><a/>se<b/><a/>ne<b/></l>
			<r>se</r>
		</p>
		<par n="en_apostrofat"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><a/>que<b/><a/>i</l>
			<r>que<b/>i</r>
		</p>
		<par n="caracter_general"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<par n="quotes_empty"/>
		<p>
			<l><a/>cnjse</l>
			<r>s</r>
		</p>
		<par n="apostrof_e"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><a/>li<b/><a/>ne<b/></l>
			<r>li</r>
		</p>
		<par n="en_apostrofat"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><a/>lo<b/></l>
			<r>l'</r>
		</p>
		<par n="vocal_general"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<par n="quotes_empty"/>
		<p>
			<l><a/>detla</l>
			<r>la</r>
		</p>
	</e>
	<e>
		<par n="quotes_empty"/>
		<p>
			<l><a/>detlo</l>
			<r>lo</r>
		</p>
	</e>
	<e>
		<par n="quotes_empty"/>
		<p>
			<l><a/>detlas</l>
			<r>las</r>
		</p>
	</e>
	<e>
		<par n="quotes_empty"/>
		<p>
			<l><a/>detlos</l>
			<r>los</r>
		</p>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><a/>de<b/></l>
			<r>de<b/></r>
		</p>
		<par n="quotes"/>
		<p>
			<l><a/>detla<b/></l>
			<r>l'</r>
		</p>
		<par n="vocal_general"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><a/>de<b/></l>
			<r>de<b/></r>
		</p>
		<par n="quotes"/>
		<p>
			<l><a/>detlo<b/></l>
			<r>l'</r>
		</p>
		<par n="vocal_general"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><a/>de<b/></l>
			<r>de<b/></r>
		</p>
		<par n="quotes"/>
		<par n="det_simple"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><a/>que<b/></l>
			<r>que<b/></r>
		</p>
		<par n="quotes"/>
		<par n="det_simple"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><a/>que<b/><a/>de<b/></l>
			<r>que<b/>de<b/></r>
		</p>
		<par n="quotes"/>
		<par n="det_simple"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><a/>me<b/></l>
			<r>me<b/></r>
		</p>
		<par n="quotes"/>
		<par n="det_simple"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><a/>te<b/></l>
			<r>te<b/></r>
		</p>
		<par n="quotes"/>
		<par n="det_simple"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><a/>se<b/></l>
			<r>se<b/></r>
		</p>
		<par n="quotes"/>
		<par n="det_simple"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><a/>ne<b/></l>
			<r>ne<b/></r>
		</p>
		<par n="quotes"/>
		<par n="det_simple"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><a/>sus<b/></l>
			<r>sus<b/></r>
		</p>
		<par n="quotes"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><a/>jos<b/></l>
			<r>jos<b/></r>
		</p>
		<par n="quotes"/>
	</e>
